Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202045-601
Act, how cited; collection agency; license required; violation; penalty; foreign agency; communication authorized.

Sections 45-601 to 45-622 shall be known and may be cited as the Collection Agency Act.

No person, firm, corporation, or association shall conduct or operate a collection agency or do a collection agency business as defined in the act until he, she, or it has secured a license as provided in the act. Any person, firm, corporation, or association conducting or operating such a collection agency or doing such a collection agency business without a license shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor for each day that such unlawful business is conducted. Any officer or agent of a firm, corporation, or association who personally participates in any violation of the act shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to require a regular employee of a collection agency duly licensed as such in this state to procure a collection agency license.

Nothing in the act shall be construed to prohibit a person, firm, corporation, or association regulated as a collection agency in another state and residing in another state from communicating with a debtor in this state.

Laws 1963, c. 500, § 1, p. 1592;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 299;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 81-8,158;

Laws 1984, LB 471, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 261, § 1;

Laws 2020, LB909, § 25.

Exemptions from Credit Services Organization Act, see section 45-803.

Failure to report and pay collections made within specified time justified revocation of license. State ex rel. Hartman v. Weiss, 181 Neb. 685, 150 N.W.2d 264 (1967).